District of Columbia statutes.
31-2201

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.

(1A)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(2)

“Non-U.S. insurer” means an insurer organized under the laws of a foreign country.

(3)

Repealed.

(4)

“United States Branch” or “U.S. Branch” means the business unit through which business is transacted within the United States by a non-U.S. insurer and the assets and liabilities of the insurer within the United States pertaining to such business.

May 24, 1996, D.C. Law 11-128, § 2, 43 DCR 1562
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 45(a), 45 DCR 745
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 4(m), 51 DCR 2817
1981 Ed., § 35-4401.
D.C. Law 15-166, in par. (1), substituted “Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking” for “Commissioner of Insurance and Securities”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(m) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).